California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(h) (1) The department shall monitor county compliance with applicable program regulations, loan agreements and regulatory agreements, and any agreements related to the program that designate the department as a third-party beneficiary, and enforce those regulations and agreements to the extent necessary and desirable in order to provide, to the greatest degree possible, the successful provision of permanent supportive housing.

(2) The department shall annually report to the authority the status of its efforts pursuant to this section and Section 5849.9, as set forth in Section 5849.11.

(i) The department may provide technical assistance to counties or developers of supportive housing to facilitate the construction of permanent supportive housing for the target
 population.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 165, Sec. 13.   (SB 1030)   Effective September 25, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.9.

(a) Under any service contract entered into under Section 5849.35, in addition to the competitive program established by Section 5849.8, the department may distribute an amount not to exceed two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) from the fund on an “over-the-counter” basis to finance the construction, rehabilitation, or preservation, and to capitalize operating reserves, of permanent supportive housing for individuals in the target population with a priority for those with mental health supportive needs who are homeless or at risk of chronic homelessness. Funds shall be offered as either deferred payment loans to finance capital costs, including acquisition, design, construction, rehabilitation, or preservation, of permanent supportive housing for the target population or grants for the capitalized operating subsidy
 reserve, as specified by the department in its guidelines, for permanent supportive housing for the target population. Funds to be awarded pursuant to this section shall be available to all counties within the state proportionate to the number of homeless persons residing within each county as calculated in Section 5849.6 or in the amount of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), whichever is greater. A county receiving these funds shall commit to provide mental health supportive services and coordinate the provision of, or referral to, other services, including, but not limited to, substance abuse treatment services, to the tenants of the supportive housing development for at least 20 years. Services shall be provided onsite at the supportive housing development or at a location otherwise easily accessible to the tenants.

(b) Funds not awarded within 18 months following the first allocation of moneys in accordance with subdivision (d) shall
 be used for the purposes of the competitive program.

(c) The moneys described in subdivision (a) shall be administered either in accordance with the procedures for awarding funds to local agencies established by the existing Mental Health Services Act housing program administered by the State Department of Health Care Services and the California Housing Finance Agency or alternative procedures developed by the department for distributing these moneys that enhance the efficiency and goals of the distribution program.

(d) The department shall make the first allocation of moneys pursuant to this section as soon as reasonably practical and in any event no later than 150 days after the effective date of a final judgment, with no further opportunity for appeals, in any court proceeding affirming the validity of the contracts authorized by the authority and the department pursuant to
 Section 5849.35 and any bonds authorized to be issued by the authority pursuant to Section 15463 of the Government Code and any contracts related to those bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 165, Sec. 14.   (SB 1030)   Effective September 25, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.10.

(a) The sum of six million two hundred thousand dollars ($6,200,000) is hereby appropriated from the Mental Health Services Fund to the department to provide technical and application preparation assistance to counties.

(b) Eligible use of technical and application preparation assistance shall include, but is not limited to, assistance in performing one or more of the following activities:

(1) Applying for program funds.

(2) Implementing activities funded by moneys distributed pursuant to this part, including the development of supportive housing for the target
 population.

(3) Coordinating funded activities with local homelessness systems, including coordinated access systems developed pursuant to Section 578.7(a)(8) of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that section read on May 1, 2016. 

(4) Delivering a range of supportive services to tenants.

(5) Collecting data, evaluating program activities, and sharing data among multiple systems, such as the Mental Health Services Act, enacted by Proposition 63 at the November 2, 2004, statewide general election, the Medi-Cal Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9) and implementing regulations, and homelessness systems.

(c) The department shall provide funds to a county upon application as follows:

(1) To a large county and to the County of Los Angeles, the department shall provide one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(2) To a medium county, the department shall provide one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(3) To a small county, the department shall provide seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).

(d) If a county does not expend the moneys allocated pursuant to subdivision (c) by June 30, 2020, those moneys shall be used to augment the funding pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) The department may contract for expert technical assistance and application preparation assistance. The department shall deploy such assistance to counties based upon a process to be defined in
 guidelines.

(f) The department may establish a unit for the purpose of providing technical assistance to counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 43, Sec. 5.   (AB 1618)   Effective July 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.11.

(a) The counties shall annually report to the department on activities funded under this part, including information on the funded supportive housing development. Reported information shall include location of projects, number of units assisted, occupancy restrictions, number of individuals and households served, related income levels, and homeless, veteran, and mental health status.

(b) The department shall include a report on the program in the annual report required by Section 50408 of the Health and Safety Code, commencing with the year after the first full year in which the program is in effect. The report shall contain the following:

(1) The processes established for distributing funds.

(2) The distribution of funds among counties.

(3) Any recommendations as to modifications to the program for the purpose of improving efficiency or furthering the goals of the program.

(c) The department shall submit a report to the authority by December 31 of each year, commencing with the year after the first full year in which the program is in effect, that contains the information described in subdivision (a) and paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) for all counties participating in the program and the services that have been provided pursuant to any service contracts entered into pursuant to Section 5849.35.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 770, Sec. 22.   (AB 1764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.12.

(a) Upon an appropriation of funds for the purpose of this section, the department shall contract with a public or private research university in this state to evaluate the program. The department shall develop the research design and issue a request for proposal for a contract for the evaluation, with the assistance of the Legislative Analyst’s Office and the Department of Finance.

(b) The department shall submit the final research design and request for proposal required by subdivision (a) to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no more than 30 days prior to executing a contract for the evaluation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 43, Sec. 5.   (AB 1618)   Effective July 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.13.

An action to determine the validity of any contract or loan authorized pursuant to Section 5849.35 or of any bond authorized to be issued pursuant to Section 15463 of the Government Code, and any contracts related to those bonds, may be brought in accordance with Section 17700 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 322, Sec. 13.   (AB 1628)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.14.

The Department of Finance may authorize one or more loans from the General Fund to the No Place Like Home Fund for cashflow purposes in an aggregate amount not to exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000) subject to the following conditions:

(a) The loans are for either of the following purposes:

(1) To allow the department to begin program implementation activities, including, but not limited to, drafting program guidelines and regulations.

(2) To allow the department, the authority, and the Treasurer to implement Section 5849.35 of this code and Section 15463 of the Government Code, including, but not limited to, payment for financial advisory and legal
 services to prepare for, and in connection with, any validation action pursuant to Section 5849.13 or any other court action regarding this part or Section 15463 of the Government Code.

(b) The loans are short term, and shall be repaid within 30 days after the deposit of bond proceeds into the fund pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 5849.4.

(c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 274.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.15.

The voters ratify all of the following provisions as being consistent with and in furtherance of Proposition 63, enacted by the voters at the November 2, 2004, statewide general election, and approve all of the following provisions for purposes of Section 1 of Article XVI of the California Constitution:

(a) Chapter 43 of the Statutes of 2016, which amended Sections 5830, 5845, 5847, 5848, 5897, and 5899 and added this part.

(b) Chapter 322 of the Statutes of 2016, which added Section 15463 to the Government Code, and amended Sections 5849.1, 5849.2, 5849.3, 5849.4, 5849.5, 5849.7, 5849.8, 5849.9, 5849.11, 5849.14, 5890, and
 5891 of, added Section 5849.35 to, and repealed and added Section 5849.13 of, this code.

(c) Those provisions of Chapter 561 of the Statutes of 2017 that amended any of the provisions referenced in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) The amendments to Section 5849.35, 5849.4, and 5890 made by the act adding this section.

(e) The issuance by the California Health Facilities Financing Authority of bonds in an amount not to exceed two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) for the purposes of financing permanent supportive housing pursuant to the No Place Like Home Program and related purposes as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 15463 of the Government Code, the issuance of bonds for the purpose of redeeming, refunding, or
 retiring bonds as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 15463 of the Government Code, and the process by which those bonds are issued, secured, and repaid, as set forth in the provisions referenced in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 41, Sec. 5.   Effective December 19, 2018.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 6, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. THE CHILDREN'S MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ACT [5850. - 5886.]



  CHAPTER 1. Interagency System of Care [5850. - 5878.3.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings and Intent [5850. - 5851.5.]

5850.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Children’s Mental Health Services Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1229, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5851.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there is no comprehensive county interagency system throughout California for the delivery of mental health services to children with serious emotional and behavioral disturbance and their families. Specific problems to be addressed include the following:

(1) The population of children which should receive highest priority for services has not been defined.

(2) Clear and objective client outcome goals for children receiving services have not been specified.

(3) Although
 children with serious emotional and behavioral disturbance usually have multiple disabilities, the many different state and county agencies, particularly education, social services, juvenile justice, health, and mental health agencies, with shared responsibility for these individuals, do not always collaborate to develop and deliver integrated and cost-effective programs.

(4) A range of community-based treatment, case management, and interagency system components required by children with serious emotional disturbance has not been identified and implemented.

(5) Service delivery standards that ensure culturally competent care in the most appropriate, least restrictive environment have not been specified and required.

(6) The mental health system lacks accountability and methods to measure progress towards client outcome goals and cost-effectiveness. There are also no requirements for other state and county agencies to collect or share relevant data necessary for the mental health system to conduct this evaluation.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that the model developed in Ventura County beginning in the 1984–85 fiscal year through the implementation of Chapter 1474 of the Statutes of 1984 and expanded to the Counties of Santa Cruz, San Mateo, and Riverside in the 1989–90 fiscal year pursuant to Chapter 1361 of the Statutes of 1987, provides a comprehensive, interagency system of care for children with serious emotional and behavioral disturbance and their families and has successfully met the performance outcomes required
 by the Legislature. The Legislature finds that this accountability for outcomes is a defining characteristic of a system of care as developed under this part. It finds that the system established in these four counties can be expanded statewide to provide greater benefit to children with serious emotional and behavioral disturbance at a lower cost to the taxpayers. It finds further that substantial savings to the state and these four counties accrue annually, as documented by the independent evaluator provided under this part. Of the amount continuing to be saved by the state in its share of out-of-home placement costs and special education costs for those counties and others currently funded by this part, a portion is hereby
 reinvested to expand and maintain statewide the system of care for children with serious emotional and behavioral disturbance.

(c) Therefore, using the Ventura County model guidelines, it is the intent of the Legislature to accomplish the following:

(1) To phase in the system of care for children with a serious emotional and behavioral problem developed under this part to all counties within the state.

(2) To require that 100 percent of the new funds appropriated under this part be dedicated to the targeted population as defined in Sections 5856 and 5856.2. To this end, it is the intent of the Legislature that families of eligible children be involved in county program planning and design and, in all cases, be involved in
 the development of individual child treatment plans.

(3) To expand interagency collaboration and shared responsibility for
 children with serious emotional and behavioral disturbance in order to do the following:

(A) Enable a child to remain at home with the child’s family whenever possible.

(B) Enable a child placed in foster care for the child’s protection to remain with a foster family in the child’s community as long as separation from the child’s natural family is determined necessary by the juvenile court.

(C) Enable a special education pupil to attend public school and make academic progress.

(D) Enable a juvenile offender to decrease delinquent behavior.

(E) Enable a child requiring
 out-of-home placement in a licensed residential group home or psychiatric
 hospital to receive that care in as close proximity as possible to the child’s usual residence.

(F) Separately identify and categorize funding for these services.

(4) To increase accountability by expanding the number of counties with a performance contract that requires measures of client outcomes and cost avoidance.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the outcomes prescribed by this section shall be achieved regardless of the cultural or ethnic origin of the child with serious and behavioral disturbance or the
 child’s family.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 48.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5851.5.

For the purposes of this part, a “system of care county” means a county which has been approved by the State Department of Health Care Services as having the capability to provide child- and family-centered services in a collaborative manner, resulting in quantitative outcome measures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 196.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. County Systems of Care and Their Mission [5852. - 5855.5.]

5852.

There is hereby established an interagency system of care for children with serious emotional and behavioral disturbances that provides comprehensive, coordinated care based on the demonstration project under former Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 5575), as added by Chapter 160 of the Statutes of 1987, and the former 1983 State Department of Mental Health planning model for children’s services. Each participating county shall adapt the model to local needs and priorities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 197.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5852.5.

The State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, shall review those counties that have been awarded funds to implement a comprehensive system for the delivery of mental health services to children with a serious emotional disturbance and to their families or foster families to determine compliance with either of the following:

(a) The total estimated cost avoidance in all of the following categories shall equal or exceed the applications for funding award moneys:

(1) Group home costs paid by Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care (AFDC-FC) program.

(2) Children and adolescent state hospital and acute inpatient programs.

(3) Nonpublic school residential placement costs.

(4) Juvenile justice reincarcerations.

(5) Other short- and long-term savings in public funds resulting from the applications for funding award moneys.

(b) If the department determines that the total cost avoidance listed in subdivision (a) does not equal or exceed applications for funding award amounts, the department shall determine that the county that has been awarded funding shall achieve substantial compliance with all of the following goals:

(1) Total cost avoidance in the categories listed in subdivision (a) to exceed 50 percent of the applications
 for funding award moneys.

(2) A 20-percent reduction in out-of-county ordered placements of juvenile justice wards and social service dependents.

(3) A statistically significant reduction in the rate of recidivism by juvenile offenders.

(4) A 25-percent reduction in the rate of state hospitalization of minors from placements of special education pupils.

(5) A 10-percent reduction in out-of-county nonpublic school residential placements of special education pupils.

(6) Allow at least 50 percent of children at risk of imminent placement served by the intensive in-home crisis treatment programs, which are wholly or partially funded by applications for funding award moneys, to remain at home
 at least six months.

(7) Statistically significant improvement in school attendance and academic performance of special education pupils with serious emotional disturbance treated in day treatment programs that are wholly or partially funded by applications for funding award moneys.

(8) Statistically significant increases in services provided in nonclinic settings among agencies.

(9) Increase in ethnic minority and gender access to services proportionate to the percentage of these groups in the county’s schoolage population.

(c) This
 section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 74) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 49.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5853.

County participation under this part shall be voluntary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1229, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5854.

The State Department of Health Care Services may contract with counties whose programs have been approved by the department and selected pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 5857). A county may request to participate under this part each year according to the terms set forth in Section 5705 for the purpose of establishing a three-year program proposal for developing and implementing a children’s comprehensive mental health services system. The contract shall be negotiated on a yearly basis, based on the scope of work plan for each implementation phase.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 199.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5855.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall adopt as part of its overall mission the development of community-based, comprehensive, interagency systems of care that target children with serious emotional and behavioral disturbance separated from their families or at risk of separation from their families, as defined in Section 5856. These comprehensive, interagency systems of care shall seek to provide the highest benefit to children, their families, and the community at the lowest cost to the public sector. Essential values shall be as follows:

(a) Family preservation. A child shall be maintained in their
 home with the child’s family whenever possible.

(b) Least restrictive setting. A child shall be placed in the least restrictive and least costly setting appropriate to the child’s needs when out-of-home placement is necessary.

(c) Natural setting. A child benefits most from mental health services in the child’s natural environment, where the child lives and learns, such as home, school, foster home, or a juvenile detention center.

(d) Interagency collaboration and a coordinated service delivery system. The primary child-serving agencies, such as social services, probation, education, health, and mental health agencies, shall collaborate at the policy, management, and
 service levels to provide a coordinated, goal-directed system of care for
 children with serious emotional disturbance and their families.

(e) Family involvement. Family participation is an integral part of assessment, intervention, and evaluation.

(f) Cultural competence. Service effectiveness is dependent upon both culturally relevant and competent service delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 50.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5855.5.

(a) Projects funded pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) of Division 5, as added by Chapter 89 of the Statutes of 1991, shall continue under the terms of this part.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall negotiate with each participating county to establish appropriate evaluation measures for the county’s children’s system of care program after the initial three-year implementation
 funding period as established in Section 5854. The department shall, on an annual basis, negotiate a performance contract with each county electing to continue its children’s system of care program. The annual performance contract shall be consistent county to county, and shall include, but not be limited to, a scope of work plan consistent with the provisions of this part and shall contain a budget that has sufficient detail to meet the requirements of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 201.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Target Client Population [5856. - 5856.2.]

5856.

For the purposes of this part, “children with serious emotional disturbance” means those minors under 18 years of age as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5600.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 51.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5856.2.

(a) An eligible child includes a child with serious emotional disturbance who meets the requirements of Section 5856 and who is referred by collaborating programs, including wrap-around programs (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Part 6 of Division 9), Family Preservation programs (Part 4.4 (commencing with Section 16600) of Division 9), Juvenile Crime Enforcement
 and Accountability Challenge Grant programs (Article 18.7 (commencing with Section 749.2) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 1), programs serving children with dual diagnosis including substance use disorders or whose emotional disturbance is related to family substance use, misuse, or disorders, and children whose families are enrolled in CalWORKs (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200.5) of Part 3 of Division 9).

(b) A
 county shall ensure, within available resources, that programs are designed to serve young children from zero to five years of age, inclusive, their families, and adolescents in transition from 15 to 21 years of age, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 52.5.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. County Selection [5857. - 5860.]

5857.

(a) The State Department of Mental Health shall issue a request for applications for funding for new children’s system of care programs to nonparticipating counties in each year that additional funds are provided for statewide expansion pursuant to this part.

(b) Applications shall be submitted to the department by a county mental health department with joint approval of collaborating local agencies including, but not limited to, special education, juvenile court, probation, child protective services agencies, the board of supervisors, and the mental health advisory board.

(c) Program staff from the department shall review all applications for funding for compliance with all requirements of law and the application guidelines established by the department.

(d) The department may accept letters of intent from a county in lieu of an application if moneys are not available to the county, to affirm commitment by the county to participate in the request for applications for funding process when moneys become available. Upon approval of an application by the director, a county shall be funded for an initial three-year contract period as described in Section 5854 and annually thereafter, consistent with the provisions of this part. If a county is complying with the provisions of this part, the department shall assure that the county receives an annual allocation consistent with departmental guidelines for full funding, as resources are made available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 520, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5859.

If applications are deficient and not ready for approval, department program staff shall provide specific written descriptions of areas of deficiency to counties and provide, to the extent feasible, any requested training, consultation, and technical assistance to assist the applicant county to achieve necessary compliance and department approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 520, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5860.

(a) Final selection of county proposals shall be subject to the amount of funding approved for expansion of services under this part.

(b) A county shall use funds distributed under this part only in support of a mental health system serving children with serious emotional disturbance in accordance with the principles and program requirements associated with the system of care model described in this part. The State Department of Mental Health shall audit and monitor the use of these funds to ensure that the funds are used solely in support of the children’s system of care program and in accordance with the performance contract described in
 subdivision (c). If county programs receiving children’s system of care funding do not comply with program and audit requirements determined by the department, funds shall be redistributed to other counties to implement, expand, or model children’s system of care programs.

(c) The department shall enter into annual performance contracts with the selected counties and enter into training and consultation contracts as necessary to fulfill its obligations under this part. These annual performance contracts shall be in addition to the county mental health services performance contracts submitted to the department under Section 5650. Any changes in the staffing patterns or protocols, or both, approved in the original program proposal shall be identified and justified in these annual performance contracts. Annual performance contracts filed by counties
 operating the program as of January 1, 2001, shall, if approved by the department, serve as the baseline contract for purposes of this subdivision. The contracts shall be exempt from the requirements of the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual and shall be exempt from approval by the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 53.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. County Proposal Components [5861. - 5864.]

5861.

Proposals for a system of care may be submitted for a region by several smaller counties acting jointly, as independent countywide proposals, or proposals to serve a discrete subset of the targeted population in a larger county, such as court dependents, court wards, or special education pupils.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1229, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5862.

(a) Each county wishing to participate under this part shall develop a three-year program proposal for phasing in the children’s comprehensive mental health services system.

(b) The three-year program proposal shall include all of the following:

(1) The components of the system the county proposes to implement in the first year, which shall include a case management component.

(2) The components of the system the county intends to implement in the second year.

(3) The remaining components of the system the county intends to implement in the third year. All components shall be in place by the end of the third year.

(c) Approval for participation shall be made by the department at the end of the three-year period.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1229, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5863.

In addition to the requirements of Section 5862, each county program proposal shall contain all of the following:

(a) Methods and protocols for the county mental health department to identify and screen the eligible target population children. These protocols shall be developed with collaborative partners and shall ensure that eligible children can be referred from all collaborating agencies.

(b) Measurable system performance goals for client outcome and cost avoidance. Outcomes shall be made available to collaborating partners and used for program improvement.

(c) Methods to achieve
 interagency collaboration by all publicly funded agencies serving children experiencing emotional disturbances.

(d) Appropriate written interagency protocols and agreements with all other programs in the county that serve similar populations of children. Agreements shall exist with wrap-around programs (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Part 6 of Division 9), Family Preservation programs (Part 4.4 (commencing with Section 16600) of Division 9), Juvenile Crime Enforcement and Accountability Challenge Grant programs (Article 18.7 (commencing with Section 749.2) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 1), programs serving children with a dual diagnosis including substance use disorder or whose emotional disturbance is related to family substance use, misuse, or disorders, and programs serving families enrolled in CalWORKs (Chapter
 2 (commencing with Section 11200.5) of Part 3 of Division 9).

(e) A description of case management services for the target
 population. Each county program proposal shall include protocols developed in the county for case management designed to provide assessment, linkage, case planning, monitoring, and client advocacy to facilitate the provision of appropriate services for the child and family in the least restrictive environment as close to home as possible.

(f) Mental health services that enable a child to remain in their usual family setting and that offer an appropriate alternative to out-of-home placement.

(g) Methods to conduct joint interagency placement screening of target population children prior to out-of-home placement.

(h) Identification of the number and level of county evaluation staff and the resources necessary to
 meet requirements established by the State Department of Health Care Services to measure client and cost outcome and other system performance measures.

(i) A budget specifying all new and currently funded mental health expenditures provided as part of the proposed system of care. The department shall establish reporting requirements for direct and indirect administrative overhead, to be included in the request for proposals. Weight shall be given to counties with lower administrative overhead costs. Administrative costs shall not exceed those of existing county mental health programs and services. Expenditures for evaluation staff and resources shall not be considered administrative costs for this purpose.

(j) Any requirements for interagency collaboration, agreements, or
 protocols contained in this section shall not diminish requirements for the confidentiality of medical information or information maintained by a county agency or department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 847, Sec. 98.   (AB 2995)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5864.

Participating counties shall, prior to the submission of their program proposals, develop baseline data on children served by the county in the mental health services system, social services system, the juvenile justice system, and the special education system. Data shall include, but not be limited to, the numbers of children and current expenditures for group homes, nonpublic school placements, and state hospital placements. This baseline data shall be submitted to the department as part of the program proposal.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1229, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. County System of Care Requirements [5865. - 5867.5.]

5865.

Each county shall have in place, with qualified mental health personnel, all of the following within three years of funding by the state:

(a) A comprehensive, interagency system of care that serves the target population as defined in Section 5856.

(b) A method to screen and identify children in the target population. County mental health staff shall consult with the representatives from special education, social services, and juvenile justice agencies, the mental health advisory board, family advocacy groups, and others as necessary to help identify all of the persons in the target populations, including persons from ethnic minority cultures which may require outreach for identification.

(c) A defined mental health case management system designed to facilitate the outcome goals for children in the target population.

(d) A defined range of mental health services and program standards that involve interagency collaboration and ensure appropriate service delivery in the least restrictive environment with community-based alternatives to out-of-home placement.

(e) A defined mechanism to ensure that services are culturally competent.

(f) A defined mechanism to ensure that services are child-centered and family-focused, with parent participation in planning and delivery of services.

(g) A method to show measurable improvement in individual and family functional status for children enrolled in the system of care.

(h) A method to measure and report cost avoidance and client outcomes for the target population which includes, but is not limited to, state hospital utilization, group home utilization, nonpublic school residential placement, school attendance and performance, and recidivism in the juvenile justice system.

(i) A plan to ensure that system of care services are planned to complement and coordinate with services provided under the federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis and Treatment services (Section 1396d(a)(4)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code), including foster children served under Section 5867.5, where those services are medically necessary but children do not meet the requirements of Section 5600.3.

(j) A plan to ensure that system of care services are planned to complement and coordinate with services provided to CalWORKs (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200.5) of Part 3 of Division 9) recipients whose families receive mental health treatment services.

(k) A defined partnership between the children’s system of care program and family members of children who have been or are currently being served in the county mental health system. This partnership shall include family member involvement in ongoing discussions and decisions regarding policy development, program administration, service development, and service delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 520, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5865.1.

When a county system of care serves children 15 to 21 years of age, the following structures and services shall, to the extent possible, be available, and if not available, the county plan shall identify a timeline for the development of these services:
